California, session 20252026, AB1452.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 17564 of the Government Code is amended to read:17564. (a) No A claim shall not be made pursuant to Sections Section 17551, 17561, or 17573, nor shall any payment be made on claims submitted pursuant to Sections Section 17551 or 17561, or pursuant to a legislative determination under Section 17573, unless these claims exceed one thousand eight hundred dollars ($1,000). ($800). However, a county superintendent of schools or county may submit a combined claim on behalf of school districts, direct service districts, or special districts within their county if the combined claim exceeds one thousand eight hundred dollars ($1,000) ($800) even if the individual school district’s, direct service district’s, or special district’s claims do not each exceed one thousand eight hundred dollars ($1,000). ($800). The county superintendent of schools or the county shall determine if the submission of the combined claim is economically feasible and shall be responsible for disbursing the funds to each school, direct service, or special district. These combined claims may be filed only when the county superintendent of schools or the county is the fiscal agent for the districts. All subsequent claims based upon the same mandate shall only be filed in the combined form unless a school district, direct service district, or special district provides to the county superintendent of schools or county and to the Controller, at least 180 days prior to the deadline for filing the claim, a written notice of its intent to file a separate claim.(b) Claims for direct and indirect costs filed pursuant to Section 17561 shall be filed in the manner prescribed in the parameters and guidelines or reasonable reimbursement methodology and claiming instructions.(c) Claims for direct and indirect costs filed pursuant to a legislatively determined mandate pursuant to Section 17573 shall be filed and paid in the manner prescribed in the Budget Act or other bill, or claiming instructions, if applicable.